North Dakota, session 69, HB1363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Superintendent of public instruction - Cardiac emergency response plan for public and
nonpublic schools and athletic events.
1. As used in this section:
a. "Automated external defibrillator" means a lightweight, portable device capable of
delivering an electric shock through an individual's chest to the individual's heart, which is
used in the event of cardiac arrest to attempt to stop an irregular heartbeat and allow a
normal rhythm to resume.
b. "Cardiac arrest" means a life-threatening event in which an individual's heart
unexpectedly stops beating.
c. "Cardiac emergency response plan" or "plan" means a written document establishing the
specific steps to reduce the chance of death from cardiac arrest.
2. The department of health and human services, in collaboration with the superintendent of
public instruction, shall create a customizable cardiac emergency response plan template for
schools and nonpublic schools to use to develop a plan tailored to the school or nonpublic
school.
3. The cardiac emergency response plan template must integrate core elements established by
the American heart association or other nationally recognized organization. The plan template
must require:
a. Review and adoption of the cardiac emergency response plan by the district crisis
management team, which must be reviewed annually.
b. Activation of the team if an individual experiences sudden cardiac arrest.
c. Placement of automated external defibrillators on school grounds.
d. Routine maintenance of automated external defibrillators.
e. Distribution of the plan on school grounds.
f. Stipulation of appropriate school personnel, including licensed coaches, school nurses,
and athletic trainers, to receive training.
g. Coordination with local emergency medical services providers.
h. Annual review and evaluation of the plan.

H. B. NO. 1363 - PAGE 2
4. Beginning with the 2027 - 28 school year, each public and nonpublic school shal l :
a. Using the template provided by the department of health and human services, develop a
cardiac emergency response plan for inclusion in the school district crisis management
plan for use by school personnel if an individual experiences sudden cardiac arrest or a
similar life-threatening emergency on school-owned grounds, and school-owned athletic
venues.
b. Place each automated external defibrillator on school grounds according to the
guidelines established by the American heart association or an organization focused on
emergency cardiovascular care.
c. Identify each automated external defibrillator with appropriate signage.
5. A school, board of a school district and each individual member of the board, governing board
and each individual governing board member of a nonpublic school, administrator, principal,
teacher, school employee, and any member of the school district crisis management team,
whether a student or an adult, are immune from any liability that might otherwise be incurred
as a result of an injury caused by any act or omission while carrying out any elements of the
cardiac emergency response plan as developed or implemented in accordance with this
section.

H. B. NO. 1363 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1363.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
Senate Vote: Yeas 42 Nays 3 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State